Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB643.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 227.200 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 227.200 to 227.400, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of housing, buildings and construction;
(2) "Department" means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;
(3) "Fire investigator" means a deputy fire marshal who has been appointed by the state
fire marshal to be a fire investigator and to exercise peace officer powers in order to
investigate crimes set out in KRS Chapter 513 and other crimes discovered in the
course of investigation;
(4) "Fire loss" means loss of or damage to property, loss of life or personal injury, by
fire, lightning, or explosion;
(5) "Local legislative body" means the chief legislative body of a city, county, urban-
county government, consolidated local government, charter county government,
or unified local government;
(6) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified local
government;
(7) "Order" or "special order" means an order of the state fire marshal, designed for the
prevention of fire loss, that affects or may affect the property rights of a particular
owner or designated property;
(8)[(6)] "Owner" means any person who owns, occupies, or has charge of any
property;
(9)[(7)] "Property" means property of all types, both real and personal, movable and
immovable; and
(10)[(8)] "Rule" or "regulation" means a general order of the commissioner, designed
for the prevention of fire loss, which affects or may affect property rights of a
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1632
designated class of owners or for the prevention of fire loss by certain indicated
hazards.
Section 2. KRS 227.210 is amended to read as follows:
Any power, duty or function, whether ministerial, discretionary or whatever character,
vested in or imposed upon the state fire marshal, by any provision of Section 3 of this
Act, KRS 227.200 to 227.410, 227.550 to 227.660, and 227.990 to 227.992 may be
exercised, discharged, and performed by any deputy or assistant of the state fire marshal
acting in the state fire marshal's name and by his delegated authority.
Section 3. KRS 227.335 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An appeal from the local appeals board or state fire marshal, in cases where no
local appeals board has been established under Section 6 of this Act, shall be
taken only from a final order on hearing.
(2) Any person who was a party to a hearing and who is aggrieved by the final order
may appeal in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B to the Circuit Court with
jurisdiction[within which the property is located].
Section 4. KRS 227.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the chief of the fire department or any officer or member of his
department designated by him for that purpose finds any property which, for want
of repairs, lack of sufficient fire escapes, age, dilapidated condition, or any other
cause, is especially liable to fire loss, or whenever an officer finds in any property,
combustible or explosive matter or inflammable materials likely to result in fire
loss, he shall order it to be remedied. The order shall forthwith be conformed to by
the owner of the property.
(2) The owner may appeal to the local appeals board or to the state fire marshal if no
local appeals board has been established under Section 6 of this Act within ten
(10) days following receipt of the order. [The state fire marshal shall, upon appeal,
conduct a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.]
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1632
Section 5. KRS 227.390 is amended to read as follows:
If any owner fails to comply with an order issued pursuant to KRS 227.380 or with an
order as modified on appeal[ to the commissioner], the officer may cause the property to
be repaired, or removed if repair is not feasible, and all fire hazard conditions remedied,
at the expense of the owner. Such expense may be enforced against any property of such
owners and the officer and those employed to do the work or who furnish materials or
equipment therefor shall have a lien for such expense on the real estate or property
involved.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 227.200 TO 227.400 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The mayor or county judge/executive of a local government which is enforcing
the fire prevention and protection codes may, upon approval of the local
legislative body, appoint a local appeals board. The local appeals board shall:
(a) Consist of five (5) technically qualified persons with professional experience
related to the fire prevention and construction industry;
(b) Hear appeals from orders of the local fire chief or designee or any deputy or
assistant of the state fire marshal acting in the state fire marshal's name
and his or her delegated authority; and
(c) Have at least three (3) members of the local appeals board that are not
employed by the local government.
(2) Local governments may enter into an interlocal cooperation agreement pursuant
to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 to cooperate with each other in providing a local appeals
board and shall adhere to the provisions of KRS Chapter 227 when entering into
an interlocal cooperation agreement.
(3) (a) A fire chief, or an employee of a local fire prevention or fire department
shall not sit on a local appeals board if the board is hearing an appeal to a
decision rendered by his or her department.
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1632
(b) A member of a local appeals board shall not hear an appeal in a case in
which he or she has a private interest.
(4) (a) Any party to a decision by the fire chief or designee, or any deputy or
assistant of the state fire marshal acting in the state fire marshal's name
and under his or her delegated authority may appeal the decision to the
local appeals board.
(b) The local appeals board shall:
1. Convene a hearing to consider the appeal within fifteen (15) days of
receipt of an appeal from a qualified party;
2. Notify all parties of the time and place of the hearing by certified mail
no later than ten (10) days prior to the date of the hearing; and
3. Render a decision within five (5) working days after the hearing.
(5) (a) An appeal shall include:
1. Citation of those provisions of the fire prevention and protection codes
which are at issue; and
2. An explanation of why the decision is being contested.
(b) The local appeals board shall uphold, amend, or reverse the decision of the
fire chief order signee, or any deputy or assistant of the state fire marshal
on each infraction being appealed.
(6) The state fire marshal shall hear appeals directly from the decisions of the fire
chief or any deputy or assistant with delegated authority in cases where no local
appeals board has been established under this section. In no case shall the state
fire marshal hear an appeal directly from a party aggrieved by the decision of the
fire chief or any deputy or assistant with delegated authority from the state fire
marshal when there is a local appeals board with jurisdiction.
(7) An appeal to the state fire marshal shall when no local appeals board has been
established under this section shall be in accordance with KRS 227.335.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1632
(8) An appeal of a local appeals board's final order, or of the state fire marshal's
final order in cases where no local appeals board has jurisdiction, shall be to the
Circuit Court with jurisdiction in accordance with KRS 13B.125.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:10 AM Jacketed